Louisiana, session 2026, HB898.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:32.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§32.1. Individual income tax rate reduction; requirements and limitations
A. Beginning January 1, 2027, the individual income tax rate provided for
in R.S. 47:32 for the tax year beginning the following January first shall be reduced
in accordance with the provisions of Subsection B of this Section if an amount of
state general fund (direct) carried forward at the close of the previous fiscal year is
certified by the commissioner of administration to the Joint Legislative Committee
on the Budget pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 39:75(A)(3)(a) and that amount is
recognized by the Revenue Estimating Conference as nonrecurring revenues.
B. The individual income tax rate reduction shall be calculated by the
secretary of the Department of Revenue. The secretary shall reduce the individual
income tax rate by a percentage that generates an estimated reduction in state
individual income tax collections equal to fifty percent of the amount certified by the
commissioner of administration and recognized by the Revenue Estimating
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-394 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 898
Conference as nonrecurring revenues. However, if the individual income tax rate
reduction as calculated by the secretary of the Department of Revenue would result
in a reduction of five-hundredths of one percent or less, then no rate reduction shall
occur.
C. When the provisions of Subsection B of this Section require a reduction
in the individual income tax rate, the secretary of the Department of Revenue shall
publish the reduced rate on the department's website and shall include the reduced
rate when publishing the tax tables pursuant to R.S. 47:295 and the withholding
tables pursuant to R.S. 47:112.
Section 2. This Act shall be known and referenced as the "Louisiana Income Tax
Elimination Act" or the "LITE Act".
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.